Hawaii statutes.
§514B-71 Condominium education trust fund. (a)
The commission shall establish a condominium education trust fund that the
commission shall use for educational purposes. Educational purposes shall
include financing or promoting:

(1) Education and research in the field of
condominium management, condominium project registration, and real estate, for
the benefit of the public and those required to be registered under this
chapter;

(2) The improvement and more efficient administration
of associations;

(3) Expeditious and inexpensive procedures for
resolving association disputes; and

(4) Support for mediation of condominium related
disputes.

(b) The commission shall use all moneys in the
condominium education trust fund for purposes consistent with subsection (a).
[L 2005, c 93, pt of §3; am L 2013, c 187, §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next